Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-2823
Insurance.

Nothing in sections 39-2808 to 39-2824 shall limit or reduce statutory or regulatory requirements regarding insurance.

Laws 2016, LB960, § 23;

Laws 2019, LB583, § 17.